Oklahoma, session 2026, SB668.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-714.1 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Covered facility” means:


a. a hospital licensed under Section 1-702 of Title 63 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, or


b. a nursing facility or specialized facility licensed


under the Nursing Home Care Act, Section 1-1901 et


seq. of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 995 Page 1


2. “Health care staffing agency” means a company that provides


temporary nursing services for covered facilities needing to fill


vacant shifts in exchange for a fee; and


3. “Health care worker” means a nurse, nurse aide, or any other


direct care clinical staff member that is employed by a health care


staffing agency and that provides nursing services to a patient or


resident of a covered facility.


B. If a health care staffing agency places a health care worker


in a covered facility who was previously employed by the covered


facility for any period of time within the preceding two (2) years,


the fee charged by the health care staffing agency for that health


care worker shall not, when converted to an hourly wage, exceed one


hundred five percent (105%) of the highest hourly wage paid to the


health care worker by the covered facility when the worker was


employed by the facility.


C. 1. A covered facility may bring an action against a health


care staffing agency alleging a violation of subsection B of this


section. A health care staffing agency found in violation of


subsection B of this section shall be liable if:


a. the covered facility, prior to bringing the action,


notified the health care staffing agency of a fee in


excess of the limit imposed by subsection B of this


section and provided accurate and detailed records of



Req. No. 995 Page 2


the employee’s pay to the health care staffing agency


to support the allegation, and


b. the health care staffing agency failed to promptly


correct the violation.


2. The court may award actual damages, punitive damages, court


costs, reasonable attorney fees, injunctive relief, and any other


appropriate relief to a prevailing plaintiff.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-995 DC 1/19/2025 5:41:01 AM





























Req. No. 995 Page 3